apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="sm/ite__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>iti</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iten</l>  <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itt</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iti</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itt</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itne</l>  <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itte</l>  <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>   <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itne</l>  <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itte</l>  <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itande</l><r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itast</l>     <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iti</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itt</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itar</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iter</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eit</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itte</l>      <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="avh/enge__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>angi</l>  <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angen</l> <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>  <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>angi</l>  <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angne</l> <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angne</l> <r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>engande</l><r>enge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eng</l>   <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enga</l>  <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enge</l>  <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>engast</l><r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>  <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>angi</l>  <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eng</l>   <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>   <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ekk</l>   <r>enge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jug/e__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gr/åte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>åti</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åten</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åte</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åti</l>   <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtne</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtne</l>  <r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtande</l><r>åte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>åt</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åta</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åte</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtast</l> <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åte</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>åti</l>   <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æt</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>    <r>åte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="avhenge"><i>avh</i><par n="avh/enge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gråte"><i>gr</i><par n="gr/åte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hikstegråte"><i>hikstegr</i><par n="gr/åte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="juge"><i>jug</i><par n="jug/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stridgråte"><i>stridgr</i><par n="gr/åte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="strigråte"><i>strigr</i><par n="gr/åte__vblex_adj"/></e>
